Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 5. Optional Rate Schedules.

§ 77-3-301.
Optional rate schedules and minimum charges to be provided in lieu of service charges.

Any person, firm, copartnership or corporation doing business in the State of Mississippi and engaged in the sale or distribution of electricity, gas or water, whose rates or tariffs for such service contain any form of so-called “service charge,” shall be required to have fair and reasonable optional rate schedules and minimum charges that do not contain any form of such so-called “service charge,” so that the consumer may exercise his option as to the form of rate schedule under which said consumer will be billed for service used. Such optional rate schedules shall not require the payment for each unit of electricity, gas, or water consumed, at a rate in excess of the rates per unit prescribed for use which were in effect prior to the establishment of a “service charge” by such person, firm or corporation affected hereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5551; Laws, 1934, ch. 318.

§ 77-3-303.
Itemized bills required.

All bills rendered to consumers by any public service utility affected by this article shall be itemized so as to show in detail the amount of electricity, gas or water consumed and the rate per unit charged.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5551; Laws, 1934, ch. 318.

§ 77-3-305.
Violations.

Any amount of money collected by any public utility in wilful violation of Section 77-3-303 may be recovered by an action at law by the consumer from whom it was collected. In addition thereto, any person, firm, copartnership or corporation violating the provisions of this article, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than $50.00 for each offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5551; Laws, 1934, ch. 318.

§ 77-3-307.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this article shall not apply:

to municipally or privately owned plants where a flat charge only is made, and no meters are in operation;

to any municipally owned and/or operated public service utility, the net income of which said utility is used solely for governmental purposes and/or for the discharge of governmental obligations and not for private gain;

to the Tennessee Valley Authority or any municipality that purchases gas, water or electric lights and power from the Tennessee Valley Authority; or

to any state corporation chartered by the State of Mississippi, or any corporation doing business in the State of Mississippi, which buys electric current and/or power from the Tennessee Valley Authority for distribution for domestic and/or commercial purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5551; Laws, 1934, ch. 318.